Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑3] Prohibition in
enclosed or partially enclosed places open to the public. Smoking shall be
prohibited in all enclosed or partially enclosed areas open to the public,
including but not limited to the following places:

(1) Airports and public transportation facilities and
vehicles, including buses and taxicabs, under the authority of the State or
county, and ticket, boarding, and waiting areas of public transit depots,
including airports from curb to cabin and including all areas within and immediately
in front of and adjacent to passenger terminals and pick-up areas, throughout
the airport facility, and up to the passenger loading gates of all state
airports;

(2) Aquariums, galleries, libraries, and museums;

(3) Areas available to and customarily used by the
general public, including but not limited to restrooms, lobbies, reception
areas, hallways, and other common areas, in businesses and nonprofit entities
patronized by the public, including but not limited to professional offices,
banks, laundromats, hotels, and motels;

(4) Bars;

(5) Bowling alleys;

(6) Convention facilities;

(7) Educational facilities, both public and private;

(8) Elevators;

(9) Facilities primarily used for exhibiting a motion
picture, stage, drama, lecture, musical recital, or other similar performance,
except when part of the performance;

(10) Health care facilities;

(11) Hotel and motel lobbies, meeting rooms, and
banquet facilities;

(12) Licensed child care and adult day care
facilities;

(13) Lobbies, hallways, and other common areas in
apartment buildings, condominiums, retirement facilities, nursing homes,
multifamily dwellings, and other multiple-unit residential facilities;

(14) Nightclubs;

(15) Polling places;

(16) Restaurants;

(17) Retail stores;

(18) Rooms, chambers, places of meeting or public
assembly under the control of an agency, board, commission, committee or
council of the State or county, to the extent the place is subject to the
jurisdiction of the State or county;

(19) Service lines; and

(20) Shopping malls. [L 2006, c 295, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next